Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5325.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 8a. (1) Subject to subsection (3), a police officer, or a
private security officer employed by a facility described in
section 45a of chapter VII of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328,
MCL 750.45a, may intercept, disable, or destroy an unmanned
aircraft that is flying in a manner that violates section 45a of
chapter VII of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.45a.
(2) A police officer or private security officer who
intercepts, disables, or destroys an unmanned aircraft under
subsection (1) is not liable to the owner of the unmanned aircraft
JJR H03693'25 (H-2) 4kjgod


for damage to the unmanned aircraft.
(3) Subsection (1) applies only to a police officer or private
security officer who completes federally approved training and
certification procedures for exercising the authority described in
subsection (1).
(4) This section applies only to the extent that this section
is not preempted by federal law.
Final Page
JJR H03693'25 (H-2) 4kjgod